Washington statutes.
RCW 13.50.150

Confidential records—Expungement to protect due process rights.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the expungement of any juvenile record ordered expunged by a court to preserve the due process rights of its subject.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 13. Formerly RCW 13.04.276, see 1979 c 155 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.